XFST/EnglishRegVerbs-v2.xfst
!######################################################################
!#
!# FINITE-STATE TRANSDUCER FOR ENGLISH REGULAR VERB PARSING/GENERATION:
!#
!##############################################################

define Con [b|c|d|f|g|h|j|k|l|m|n|p|q|r|s|t|v|x|w|z] ;

define Vowel [a|e|i|o|u] ;

define DoublingCs [b|g|m|n|p|r|t|v|d] ;

!######################################################################
!# BUILD LEXICAL TRANSDUCER


## Verb class sublexicons:

define RegVerbStem [ {walk} |
       		     {try} |
		     {fry} | 
                     {impeach} |
		     {goose} |
		     {sway} |
		     {beg} |
                     {tip} |
		     {tab} |
		     {picnic} |
		     {hem} |
		     {pin} | 
                     {spar} |
		     {pit} |
		     {rev} |
		     {bud}] ;



## Morphological features: noun and number tags:

define Verb %+V:0 ;

define ThirdSg  %+Pres%+3sg .x. %^ s %# ;

define PresPart %+PresPart .x. %^ i n g %# ;

define PastPart %+PastPart .x. %^ e d %# ;

define Past %+Past .x. %^ e d %# ;



## Lexical transducer:

define VerbLex  [ RegVerbStem Verb [ ThirdSg | PresPart | PastPart | Past 
                                             | %+Plain:0  ] ] ; 



!######################################################################
!# RULE TRANSDUCERS:
!#

# consDoubling
define consDouble [ DoublingCs -> "^[" ... "^" 2 "^]" || Vowel _ %^ [i|e] ] ;

# cDoubling 
define cDoubling [ c -> c k || Vowel _ %^ [i|e] ];

# eInsertion
define eInsertion [..] -> e || [s | z | x | s h | c h ] %^ _ s ;
 
# yReplacment
define yReplacement [ y -> i e || Con _ %^ [ s | e d ]  ] ;

# eDeletion
define eDeletion [ e -> 0 || _ %^ Vowel ] ;


# Remove morpheme and word boundary markers.

define StemBoundary %^ -> 0 ;
define WordBoundary %# -> 0 ;


!## Compile-replace algorithm for consonant doubling

read regex VerbLex .o. consDouble ;
compile-replace lower

define IntermediateLex


# Compose rule transducers: 

define RuleT eInsertion .o. yReplacement .o. eDeletion  .o. cDoubling
                        .o. StemBoundary .o. WordBoundary ;




######################################################################
# Compose lexical and rule-transducers; push onto stack;

define MorphVerbParser IntermediateLex .o. RuleT ;
push MorphVerbParser
